Utah statutes.
48-1-41.   Title.

Sections 48-1-41 through 48-1-48 are known as the "Utah Limited Liability Partnership Act."



Enacted by Chapter 61, 1994 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

